Washington statutes.
RCW 11.80.030

Reports of trustee.

The trustee shall, at the expiration of one year from the date of his or her appointment and annually thereafter and at such times as the court may direct, make and file a report and account of his or her trusteeship, setting forth specifically the amounts received and expended and the conditions of the property.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2079; 1965 c 145 s 11.80.030. Prior: 1915 c 39 s 3; RRS s 1715-3.]